Vermont statutes. TITLE 16A Education Charters and Agreements
Chapter 31. Bellows Falls Union High School District #27

=font8

2006 Adoption Note.

1966
Grafton, Westminster and Rockingham each voted to form a union school district and agreed to articles which have since been amended in Article 1(d).

1969
The town school district of Athens requested and was granted admission to the Union District.

1982
Article 1(d) amended.

ARTICLE 1.

To see if the voters of the Town School District shall vote to join the Towns of Rockingham/Grafton and Westminster for the purpose of forming a Union High School District pursuant to the authority contained in Title 16, Chapter 11, Subchapter 2, of the
Vermont Statutes Annotated, said Union High School District to be organized and operated in accordance with the provisions of said statutes except as modified by the following agreements entered into by the school districts forming said
Union High School.

Type of High School. Said Union High School District shall operate as a high school, having a four (4) year course consisting of grades 9, 10, 11, and 12.

Transportation Expense. The expense of transportation of pupils from such Town to the school shall be a matter for each Town and shall not be part of the Union District’s expense.

Tuition Pupils. The Union High School will accept tuition pupils, other than those prescribed by the State Board of Education, in Grades 9-12. when this is to the advantage of its educational program.

Board of School Directors. The School Board for said Union High School 27 shall consist of five (5) members from Rockingham, three (3) members from Westminster, one (1) member from Grafton, and one (1) member from Athens.

Student. Student enrollment shall only include students residing in a member district and enrolled for the whole or a part of a given year as of October 1, of any school year in Grades 9, 10, 11, and 12.

Apportionment of Expenses. All expenses, excluding transportation, but including building and maintaining and operating said Union High School District, and including the cost of architects, surveyors, contractors, lawyers and educational or other consultants
or experts; the purchase price of a site for a Union High School, as well as current operating expenses to be incurred by the Union District from its organization until its first annual meeting shall be divided among the member districts
in the proportion which the student enrollment, as above defined, in each member district for the previous school year bears to the total number of student enrollment, as above defined, and for said year in all Districts provided,
however, that said ratio for the first two year’s operation shall be as follows:

Westminster 20%

Grafton 5%

Rockingham 75%

Procedure for Future Amendments. No amendment to the Articles of Agreement arrived at after the organization of the Union High School District adopted by a majority of the legal voters present and voting of each member district at a Special of Annual
Meeting, duly warned.

=font8

2006 Adoption Note.

1973
Mount Holly and Ludlow each voted to form a union school district and agreed to an article, which has since been amended in (b), and an expenditure account and final report.

2005
Item (b) amended.

ARTICLE I

Shall the Town School District of Mount Holly, which the State Board of Education has found necessary to include in the proposed union school district, join with the Town School District of Ludlow, which the State Board of Education has found necessary
to include in the proposed union school district, for the purpose of forming a union school district, as provided in Title 16, Vermont Statutes Annotated, upon the following conditions and agreements:

(a)

Class of schools.
The Union School District shall operate and manage schools offering instruction in grades 7 through 12.

(b)

Board of School Directors.
Effective April 12, 2006, the Union School Board will be apportioned based on the combined population of the member school Districts, as determined by the 2000 United States Census. The number of School Directors from
each member school District within the union school district will be determined by dividing the population of each member school district by one-sixth (the initial number of total School Board Directors) of the total aggregate
population of the member school districts within the Union School District. The results of this division shall be rounded to the nearest whole number. Beginning with the 2010 United States Census and thereafter, the school Board
shall be reapportioned based upon the above formula, provided however, that the Board of School Directors may adjust the total membership of the Board in order to assure proportional representation. At no time will a member school
district have less than one school director on the union school board.

The term of office of each Director of the proposed union shall be for a period of three years; provided however that the initial Board shall be elected as follows:

Nonprofessional personnel — same as 400 series.

Professional personnel — same as 810b series.

900

Food services
budget figure to be determined on a per cent basis of the previous year’s participation.

(d)
Final Report. The provisions of the final report approved by the State Board of Education on the 22nd day of May, 1973 which is on file in the town Clerk’s office, shall govern the Union District.

Final Report

1.
The school Districts of Ludlow and Mount Holly are necessary to the establishment of the proposed Union.

2.
There are no additional school Districts the Committee considers advisable to be included in the proposed union.

3.
The Union shall be established for a class grade level from seven through twelve.

4.
No new schools are necessary to be constructed.

5.
The initial curriculum to be provided for grades seven through twelve shall be as outlined in Appendix A. As soon as practicable after the election of Union School Directors, the initial curriculum shall be
re-examined and changes made as deemed necessary.

Initially, the present teaching staff of the Ludlow School District, grade levels seven through twelve, shall be utilized, where possible. As soon as practicable after the election of Union School Directors, the teaching staff shall be re-examined and
changes made as deemed necessary.

The Union shall provide transportation. This provision is a specific condition of this report and shall not be rescinded or amended except by a majority vote of both member Districts at special or annual meetings being warned therefor.

The Union shall provide transportation in accordance with the transportation policy outlined in Appendix B. This provision is a specific condition of this report and shall not be rescinded or amended except by a majority vote of both member districts
at a special or annual meeting being warned therefor.

All expenses, including the costs of architects, surveyors, contractors, lawyers, and educational or other consultants or experts, as well as current operating expenses to be incurred by the union high school district from the time of its organization
meeting to the time the union high school district shall take over the operation of the high school, shall be pro-rated among the several member districts according to student enrollment;

The net operating costs of the union high school district, including building, operation and maintenance costs, after deduction of tuition receipts and other accruing income, shall be pro-rated among the several member districts in the same proportion
which the student enrollment, as defined in this agreement, bears to the total student enrollment from all member districts;

Effective Date. The effective date for the commencement of the operation of the union high school shall be July 1, 1963.

=font8

2006 Adoption Note.

1965
Landgrove and Londonderry each voted yes on the articles below. Later in the year Weston requested and was granted permission to join the Union District.

1972
Peru requested and was granted permission to join the Union District.

ARTICLE I

Shall the Town School District join in the formation of a Union Elementary School District, as provided by law, to consist of the Town School Districts of Landgrove and Londonderry, subject to the following agreements as to the operation of such Union
District:

(a)
Type of elementary school. The Union Elementary School District shall operate as an elementary school having courses in grades kindergarten through 8 and including a Special Education program.

(b)
Location. The Union Elementary School shall be located on the ten acre Kiggins site, North of Londonderry Village on route 11 in Londonderry.

(c)
Board of School Directors. The Board of School Directors of the Union Elementary School District shall consist of one member from the Town of Landgrove and four members from the Town of Londonderry.

(d)
Transportation. The elementary school students will be transported from each member district, and the cost of such transportation will be treated as a part of the operating expense of the Union Elementary School District.

(e)
Student enrollment. Student enrollment shall only include all students residing in a member district and enrolled on October 15 of any school year in grades kindergarten through 8 and including a class in Special Education.

(f)
Apportionment of expense. The net operating cost of the Union Elementary School District, including building, operation and maintenance costs, after deduction of tuition receipts, State Aid, and other income, shall
be pro-rated among the member districts in the same proportion which the student enrollment, as above defined, bears to the total student enrollment from all member districts.

=font8

2006 Adoption Note.

1967
Duttonsville, Andover, Cavendish, and Chester each voted yes to the following articles.

Article I. Shall the voters of the Duttonsville Independent District vote to join with the neighboring school districts of Andover, Cavendish and Chester for the purpose of forming a union high school district.

(a)

Grade level:
The grade level of said union high school shall be 7-12.

(b)

Location:
The location of said union high school shall be on a site approximately one mile southeast of the center of the Village of Chester on the southerly side of Vermont State Highway #103.

(c)

School Directors:
Each school district herein participating shall have one director for each 75 students or fractional part thereof.

(d)

Apportionment of Expenses:
Expenses including building costs, transportation expense, maintenance and operating expenses shall be divided among member districts in proportion to student enrollment under prevailing law. Student enrollment shall
mean those students resident in a member district, whether enrolled in said school or elsewhere on October 12 of the current school year.

=font8

2006 Adoption Note.

1964
Duxbury, Waitsfield, Warren and Waterbury voted yes on the articles below.

1964
Moretown and Fayston requested and were granted permission to join the Union District.

Article I. Shall the town school district join in the formation of a union high school district, as provided by law, to consist of the town school districts of Waterbury, Waitsfield, Warren and Duxbury, subject to the following agreements as to the operation
of such union school district:

(a)
Type of High School. The union high school district shall operate as a high school having courses in grades seven through twelve.

(b)
Location. The union high school shall be located on or as close as possible to the Badore farm site on Route 100 in South Duxbury.

(c)
Board of School Directors. The board of school directors of the union high school district shall consist of one member from each member district for each 100 students or major fraction thereof, calculated as in subsection
(e) below; but each member district shall have at least one member on the union high school board of school directors in any event.

(d)
Transportation. The high school students will be transported from each member district and the cost of such transportation will be treated as a part of the operating expense of the union high school district.

(e)
Student Enrollment. Student enrollment shall only include all students residing in a member district and enrolled on October 15 of any school year in grades 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, and 12 in a public school, except that students
attending the 7th and 8th grades in those member districts which before joining the union have voted not to send their 7th and 8th grade students to said union high school district shall not be included.

(f)
Apportionment of Expense. The net operating costs of the union high school district, including building, operation and maintenance costs, after deduction of tuition receipts and other income, shall be prorated among
the several member districts in the same proportion which the student enrollment, as above defined, bears to the total student enrollment from all member districts.

=font8

2006 Adoption Note.

1965
Craftsbury, Greensboro, and Hardwick each voted yes on the articles below.

1966
Craftsbury rescinded its vote and withdrew from the district. Woodbury requested and was granted admission to the Union District.

Shall the town school district join in the formation of a union high school district in grades seven through twelve, as provided by law, to consist of the town school districts of Craftsbury, Greensboro and Hardwick, subject to the following agreements
as to the operation of such union district?

(a)
The location of said union high school shall be within the territorial limits of the union district as hereby originally constituted, at such place therein as may be selected on the basis of efficiency, convenience
and minimum transportation requirements.

(b)
Transportation of pupils shall be at the expense of the union district, from and return to a central pick-up point in each member district.

(c)
Student enrollment shall include all pupils residing in a member district and enrolled in grades seven through twelve in any public school on October 15 of the preceding year.

(d)
The expenses of the union high school district, including the expense of building, operating and maintaining the union high school shall be divided among the several member districts in the proportion which the student
enrollment as above defined, from each member district bears to the total student enrollment from all member districts.

(e)
The board of school directors of said union high school district shall consist of four members from Hardwick and two members each from Greensboro and Craftsbury.

(f)
Voting on any proposal to issue bonds shall not take place until after one year from the date the union high school district becomes a body politic under the law.

=font8

2006 Adoption Note.

1964
Orleans and Barton each voted yes on the articles below.

1965
Albany, Brownington, Glover, Irasburg, Westmore, and part of Coventry requested and were granted admission to join the Union District.

To see if the voters of Barton Academy and Graded School District will vote to join with the Orleans Incorporated School District for the purpose of forming a union high school district pursuant to the authority contained in Title 16, Chapter 11, Section
601 to Section 663 inclusive of Vermont Statutes Annotated, said union high school district to be organized and operated in accordance with the provisions of said act except as modified by the following agreements entered into
by the school districts forming said union high school district:

(a)
TYPE OF HIGH SCHOOL: Said Union High School District shall operate as a High School, a Senior High School having a four year course, consisting of Grades 9, 10, 11, and 12.

(b)
LOCATION: Said Senior High School shall be located within the territorial limits of the Town of Barton on the so-called Doyon site.

(c)
TRANSPORTATION EXPENSE: The expense of transportation of pupils to the said Senior High School shall be provided by the Union High School District from a central pick-up point in each member district to the school and
then return thereto.

(d)
STUDENT ENROLLMENT: Student enrollment shall include all students residing in a member district and enrolled in a public school on October 15 of any school year in Grades 9, 10, 11, and 12.

(e)
APPORTIONMENT OF EXPENSE: All expenses including capital cost and debt service for maintaining and operating said Union High School District shall be divided among the member districts in the proportion which the student
enrollment as above defined, in each member district for the previous school year bears to the total number of student enrollment, as above defined, for said year in all the districts in said Union High School District.

(f)
BOARD OF SCHOOL DIRECTORS: The School Board of said Union High School District shall consist of two directors from Barton Academy and Graded School District and two directors from Orleans Incorporated School District.

=font8

2006 Adoption Note.

1988
Greensboro and Stannard voted yes on the following articles.

ARTICLES OF AGREEMENT

Town of Greensboro and Town of Stannard
Elementary Union District

The school board of the Union School District shall consist of two directors from each member district as such member district is constituted at the time the Union District is organized.

=font8

2006 Adoption Note.

1963
Jericho, Underhill and Underhill Incorporated school district voted to form a union school district. We were unable to locate a copy of the article on which they voted.

1964
Richmond requested and was granted permission to join the Union District.

1965
Bolton requested and was granted permission to join the Union District.

1967
Huntington requested and was granted permission to join the Union District.

1969
Bolton, Jericho, Underhill, Richmond and Huntington each voted yes to the following article:

To see if the voters of Mt. Mansfield Union High School District #17 will vote to amend its original agreement to include grades five through twelve, effective July 1, 1972, to enable the school directors to propose the construction of two, grades five
through eight schools, one located in Richmond and one in the school district of Underhill I.D., as authorized under Title

16 V.S.A. § 706n
.

=font8

2006 Adoption Note.

1964
Derby and Newport each voted yes on the following article:

ARTICLE I:
To see if the voters of the said Town of Derby/Newport School District will vote to join with the City of Newport/Derby School District to form a Union High School District under the provisions of Section 601 to
693, as amended inclusive, of Chapter 11, Title 16 of the Vermont Statutes Annotated, said Union High School District to be organized and operated in accordance with the provisions of said act except as modified by the following
agreements:

(a)

Board of School Directors:
The Board of School Directors shall be nominated in accordance with Article 2, Section 613, Title 16 of the Vermont Statutes Annotated, it being agreed that the number of school Directors be as follows: One school Director
for each 150 pupils or major fraction thereof enrolled in each member district as of October 15 of the year preceding election and at least one director from each member district.

(b)

Student enrollment:
Student enrollment shall only include all students residing in a member district and enrolled on October 15 of any school year in grades 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, and 12 in the public schools.

(c)

Use of present Derby Academy Building:
When a Union High School is constructed, the present Derby Academy building shall be used to house grades 7 and 8 as a part of the Union High School. Prior to the vote on any bond issue an agreement of sale of the Derby
Academy building to the Union High School District must be consummated.

=font8

1965
Lowell requested and was granted admission to the Union District in grades 7 through 12 upon the conditions below. In addition Brighton, Charleston, Holland, Jay, Morgan, Newport Town, Troy and Westfield requested and
were granted admission to the Union District.

(a)
No member Town School District shall be obliged to send its pupils to the Union High School in grades 7 and 8, but any may vote to do so at a Town School District meeting called and held for the purpose, provided that
admission of such pupils to grades 7 and 8 of the union high school shall take place not earlier than September of the year following the year in which such vote is taken.

(b)

Representation.
Representation on the Board of School Directors of the Union High School District shall be calculated so that there will be one Director from each member district for each 150 pupils or major fraction thereof residing
in such member district and enrolled in grades 7 through 12 of any public school on October 15 of the preceding school year, except that students attending the 7th and 8th grades in those member districts which have not voted to
send their 7th and 8th grade students to said Union High School District shall not be included. Each member district shall be represented by at least one school Director.

(c)

Apportionment of expense.
The expense of building, operating and maintaining the Union High School shall be divided among the several member districts in the proportion which the student enrollment from each District, as above defined, bears
to the total student enrollment from all member districts.

(d)

Purchase of Derby Academy.
Upon construction of a new Union High School building, the present Derby Academy building shall be used to house grades 7 and 8 as part of the Union High School. Prior to or concurrently with the issue of any bonds
to finance construction of a new Union High School the Union High School District shall secure the right to acquire the Derby Academy building from the Derby Town School District, the expense of such acquisition to be divided as
above provided.

=font8

1970
Holland voted to change its membership from a 9-12 basis to a 8-12 basis.

1988
The member districts voted yes on the following:

Shall the manner in which the operating and capital expenses and liabilities of the North Country Union High School District are allocated among the member town and city school districts be amended as follows:

Effective with its fiscal year beginning July 1, 1988, and for all fiscal years thereafter, the operating and capital expenses and liabilities of the North Country Union High School District shall be allocated among the member town and city school districts
in the following manner:

1.
All operating and capital expenses and liabilities pertaining to the North Country Union Junior High School shall be allocated only to those school districts that are members of the North Country Union High School District
with respect to Grades 7 and 8, or either of said Grades. The allocation shall be made among said member school districts in the proportion which the student enrollment from each member school district in the North Country Union
Junior High School bears to the total enrollment in that facility from all member school districts.

2.
All operating and capital expenses and liabilities pertaining to the North Country Union Senior High School shall be allocated only to those school districts that are members of the North Country Union High School District
with respect to Grades 9 through 12, both inclusive. The allocation shall be made among said member school districts in the proportion which the student enrollment from each member school district in the North Country Union Senior
High School bears to the total enrollment in that facility from all member school districts.

3.
Student enrollment shall be determined by reference to actual student enrollment in each facility on October 15 in the school year immediately preceding the fiscal year budget for which the allocation is being made.

4.
Whenever possible all expenses and liabilities shall be apportioned between North Country Union Junior High School and North Country Union Senior High School on the basis of actual cost. If a particular expense or liability
item cannot be apportioned on the basis of actual cost with respect to each facility, the Board of Directors of the North Country Union High School District, in its discretion, shall determine an apportionment by use of one of
the following methods: prorated resident pupil enrollment, prorated teaching staff or prorated area of the buildings comprising each facility.

5.
All decisions relative to the operation of the Junior High School will be voted on only by the board members that are elected to represent those school districts that are members of the North Country Union High School
District with respect to Grades 7 and 8 or either of said grades. All decisions relative to the operation of the Senior High School will be voted on only by the board members that are elected to represent those school districts
that are members of the North Country Union High School District with respect to Grades 9-12.

6.
All decisions relative to the operation of the Junior High School that require a public vote will be voted on only by the legal voters that reside in a town and/or city that is a member of the North Country Union High
School District with respect to Grades 7 and 8 or either of said grades. All decisions relative to the operation of the Senior High School that require a public vote will be voted on only by the legal voters that reside in a town
and/or city that is a member of the North Country Union High School District with respect to Grades 9-12.

=font8

2006 Adoption Note.

1959
Brandon Graded School District, Brandon Town School District, Goshen, and Pittsford each voted yes on the question below.

1963
Leicester requested and was granted permission to join the Union District.

1969
Whiting requested and was granted permission to join the Union District on a 7-12 basis.

2003
The member districts voted to amend section (d) in order that students are counted according to average daily membership instead of the number enrolled.

In the event, and only in the event, that the Brandon Graded School District, Inc., an Incorporated School District in the Town of Brandon shall vote to join and become a member of the Union High School District herein proposed, to see if the voters of
the Town School District of the Town of Pittsford/Goshen/Brandon will vote to join with said Brandon Graded School District, Inc. and with the Town School Districts of the Towns of Brandon, Chittenden, Goshen, Leicester, Orwell,
Rochester, Shoreham, Sudbury and Whiting, or with any one or more of such town school districts, for the purpose of forming a Union High School District, pursuant to No. 202 of the Acts of 1953, as amended by No. 201 of the Acts
of 1955 and No. 60 of the Acts of 1957, said Union High School District to be organized and operated in accordance with the provisions of said Acts of 1953, as amended, except as the provisions of such Acts may be modified by the
terms and provisions of the following paragraphs, which said terms and provisions shall constitute agreements binding upon all of the school districts as become a member of said Union High School District.

(a)

Type of High School:
Said Union High School District shall construct and operate a junior-senior high school providing six years of secondary school education in grades 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, and 12.

(b)

Location:
Should the Town School District of the Town of Pittsford vote to join and become a member of said Union High School District, said Union High School building shall be located within the Town of Brandon upon a site situated
southerly of the town road running in an easterly-westerly direction, just northerly of Jones Pond, so-called, between the highway, U.S. Route No. 7, and the highway, State Aid Route No. 8, leading from said U.S. Route No. 7 to
that part of Brandon known as Forestdale. In the event the Pittsford Town School District should not become a member of said Union School District, said high school building shall be located within the Town of Brandon upon such
site as the Board of School Directors of said Union School District shall select.

(c)

Name:
The name of said junior-senior high school shall be Otter Valley Union High School.

(d)

Student Enrollment:
Student enrollment, as to any given school year, shall be the average daily membership enrolled in said junior-senior union high school during the census period established by

16 V.S.A. § 4001(1)(A)
as now constituted or hereafter amended.

(e)

Option As To 7th And 8th Grade Students.
Each member district, prior to the formation of said Union High School District, shall have the right to decide whether or not to send its 7th and 8th grade students to said junior-senior union high school, and, if
any member district shall vote not to send its 7th and 8th grade students to said junior-senior union high school, such students shall not be included in the student enrollment of said Union High School District, as above defined.

(f)

Apportionment of Expense.
All expenses of said Union High School District, including the building, maintaining and operating of said junior-senior union high school and the transportation of students, shall be divided among the member districts
in the proportion which the student enrollment, as above defined, in each member district for the previous year bears to the total student enrollment in all the member districts of said Union High School District.

(g)

Board of School Directors.
The Board of School Directors of said Union High School District shall consist of directors to be nominated by the member districts at their respective annual meetings, or at special meetings called for that purpose,
and elected at the annual meeting of the Union High School District. Each member district shall be entitled to one director for each seventy-five (75) students, or fractional number thereof, in said District, said students to be
counted on the basis of student enrollment, as above defined, for the previous year, provided that a member district shall be entitled to a director only if the student enrollment, as above defined, for the previous school year
for that member district was five (5) or more. Temporary school Directors to serve for the period of time from the formation of said Union High School District up to the first annual meeting of said Union High School District shall
be elected from the nominees of the respective member districts, said temporary Directors to be nominated prior to the first meeting of the Union High School District to be called by the Commissioner of Education as provided in
Sec. 6 of No. 202 of the Acts of 1953, as amended.

=font8

2006 Adoption Note.

1966
Bradford, Corinth, Fairlee, and Newbury each voted to form a Union School District and agreed to articles below.

1968
The Town School District of Corinth and Fairlee requested and were granted permission to withdraw from the Union District.

1.
To determine by ballot whether the voters of these towns will vote to join a Union School District, the members of such district to be Bradford, Corinth, Fairlee, and Newbury - said Union High School District to be
formed pursuant to the authority granted by Vermont Statutes Annotated, Chapter 11, Title 16 as amended thereof, and operated in accordance with the provisions of said statutes except as modified by the following agreements entered
into by the districts which become members of such Union School District.

A.
Said Union School District shall operate a school covering grades 7-12.

B.
The Junior-Senior High School, grades 7 through 12, shall be located in a new building, the site for which shall be recommended by the Union School Board of Directors subject to the approval of the voters.

C.
The present school buildings of the Town of Bradford and the school buildings of Newbury School District shall not enter into the contractual arrangements made by member towns of the proposed Union District.

D.
Such educational equipment, instructional materials, etc., as deemed necessary by the Union School Board of Directors owned and used by member schools in grades 7-12 may be purchased at a value placed upon them by the
Union School Board of Directors. A member town may reserve right to refusal.

E.
All expenses of the Union School District, including building, acquisition and construction costs, amortization of indebtedness, maintenance and operation, including transportation, shall be divided among the member
districts in the proportion which 7th through 12th grade enrollment as of a date established by the Union Board of Directors in each member district for the previous school year bears to the total number of the 7th through 12th
grade students enrolled in said year from all of the town school districts that are members of the Union School District.